District of Columbia statutes.
31-3302.04

Market requirements.

(a)

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to require that a health insurer offering health insurance coverage only in connection with group health plans or through one or more bona fide associations, or both, offer such health insurance coverage in the individual market.

(b)

A health insurer offering health insurance coverage in connection with group health plans under this subchapter shall not be deemed to be a health insurer offering individual health insurance coverage solely because such issuer offers a conversion policy.

(c)

A health insurer offering individual health insurance coverage solely because such insurer offers any insurance coverage for children as a participant in a pilot program relating to insurance coverage for children shall not be deemed to be a health insurer offering individual health insurance coverage.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 204, 45 DCR 8433
See notes to § 31-3301.01.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.
1981 Ed., § 35-1025.